Vermont, session 2025-2026, H545.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Effective on Passage until July 1, 2031: Commissioner of Health’s
Immunization Recommendations * * *
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 1130 is amended to read:
§ 1130. IMMUNIZATION FUNDING
(a) As used in this section:
* * *
(4) “Immunizations Recommended immunization” means vaccines a
vaccine or other immunizing agent that provides protection against a particular
disease or pathogen and the application of the vaccines immunization as
recommended by the practice guidelines for children and adults established by
the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices (ACIP) to the Centers for
Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) Commissioner pursuant to section
1130a of this title.
* * *
(b)(1) The Department of Health shall administer an immunization
program with the goals of ensuring universal access to vaccines recommended
immunizations for all Vermonters at no charge to the individual and reducing
the cost at which the State may purchase vaccines recommended
immunizations. The Department shall purchase, provide for the distribution of,
VT LEG #388353 v.1

No. 76 Page 2 of 22
2026
and monitor the use of vaccines recommended immunizations as provided for
in this subsection and subsection (c) of this section. The cost of the vaccines
recommended immunizations and an administrative surcharge shall be
reimbursed by health insurers as provided for in subsections (e) and (f) of this
section.
(2) The Department shall solicit, facilitate, and supervise the
participation of health care professionals, health care facilities, and health
insurers in the immunization program in order to accomplish the State’s goal
of universal access to recommended immunizations at the lowest practicable
cost to individuals, insurers, and State health care programs.
(3) The Department shall gather and analyze data regarding the
immunization program for the purpose of ensuring its quality and maximizing
protection of Vermonters against diseases preventable by vaccination
immunization.
(c) The Department shall determine which recommended immunizations
shall be purchased under the program. The immunization program shall
purchase vaccines recommended immunizations consistent with the goals of
the program from the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention or
another vendor at the lowest available cost. The Department shall determine
annually which vaccines for adults shall be purchased under the program.
VT LEG #388353 v.1

No. 76 Page 3 of 22
2026
(d) The immunization program shall provide for distribution of the
vaccines recommended immunizations to health care professionals and health
care facilities for administration to patients.
(e) Health insurers shall remit to the Department the cost of vaccines
recommended immunizations, as established by the Commissioner of Health
based on the recommendation of the Immunization Funding Advisory
Committee established in subsection (g) of this section.
(f) The Department shall charge each health insurer a surcharge for the
costs and administration of the immunization program. The surcharge shall be
deposited into an existing special fund and used solely for the purpose of
administering the program.
(g)(1) The Immunization Funding Advisory Committee is established to
provide the Commissioner of Health with an annual per-member per-month
cost for vaccines recommended immunizations for the pediatric population, an
annual per-member per-month cost for vaccines recommended immunizations
for the adult population, and a recommendation for the amount of the yearly
vaccine immunization assessment. The Committee shall comprise the
following nine members:
(A) the Executive Officer of the Board of Pharmacy or designee;
(B) the Executive Director of the Green Mountain Care Board or
designee;
VT LEG #388353 v.1

No. 76 Page 4 of 22
2026
(C) a representative, appointed by the Director of the Vermont
Blueprint for Health, nominated by the Director of the Blueprint and appointed
by the Commissioner of Health;
(D) three representatives of health insurers, one from each of each
appointed by the State’s largest three private health insurers, as determined by
the number of covered lives, appointed by the Commissioner of Health;
(E) a representative, appointed by the Vermont chapter of the
American Academy of Pediatrics, Vermont chapter, appointed by the
Commissioner of Health;
(F) a representative, appointed by the Vermont chapter of the
American Academy of Family Medicine, Vermont chapter, appointed by the
Commissioner of Health; and
(G) a representative of employers that self-insure for health coverage,
appointed by the Commissioner of Health.
(2) The Committee shall select a chair from among its members at the
first meeting of each calendar year. The Committee shall receive
administrative and technical support from the Department of Health.
(3) By On or before January 1 of each year, the Committee shall provide
to the Commissioner the annual fiscal assessment and the per-member per-
month cost for pediatric vaccines recommended immunizations based on the
total number of pediatric covered lives reported by health insurers and the per-
VT LEG #388353 v.1

No. 76 Page 5 of 22
2026
member per-month cost for adult vaccines recommended immunizations based
on the total number of adult covered lives reported by health insurers.
(h) If federal purchase requirements do not further the goal of ensuring
universal access to vaccines recommended immunizations for all, the
Commissioner may, following consultation with the Immunization Funding
Advisory Committee, discontinue the program with six months’ advance
notice to all health care professionals and to all health insurers with Vermont
covered lives.
(i) The Department may adopt rules under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to
implement this section.
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. § 1130a is added to read:
§ 1130a. RECOMMENDED IMMUNIZATIONS
(a) The Commissioner shall periodically issue recommendations regarding:
(1) which immunizations children and adults are recommended to
receive;
(2) the age at which each immunization is recommended to be given;
(3) the number of immunization doses that are recommended to be
administered;
(4) the recommended amount of time between doses of an
immunization; and
(5) any other recommendations regarding immunizations necessary to
promote the maintenance of public health and disease prevention in the State.
VT LEG #388353 v.1

No. 76 Page 6 of 22
2026
(b) Prior to issuing recommendations under subsection (a) of this section,
the Commissioner shall:
(1) consult with the Vermont Immunization Advisory Council,
established under section 1131 of this title; and
(2) consider recommendations for immunizations issued by the Centers
for Disease Control and Prevention’s Advisory Committee on Immunization
Practices (ACIP), the American Academy of Pediatrics (AAP), the American
Academy of Family Physicians (AAFP), the American College of
Obstetricians and Gynecologists (ACOG), the American College of Physicians
(ACP), and any other organizations the Commissioner may deem necessary.
(c) A health care professional who prescribes, dispenses, or administers an
immunization in accordance with the recommendations issued pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section shall be immune from civil and administrative
liability for immunization-caused adverse events, unless the health care
professional’s actions regarding prescribing, dispensing, or administering an
immunization constituted gross negligence, recklessness, or intentional
misconduct.
(d) The Commissioner may issue a standing order authorizing health care
professionals, including pharmacists, to prescribe, dispense, or administer
recommended immunizations, or any combination thereof, to the extent that
prescribing, dispensing, or administering recommended immunizations is
within the scope of the health care professional’s practice.
VT LEG #388353 v.1

No. 76 Page 7 of 22
2026
(e)(1) The Department shall prominently display information pertaining to
recommended immunizations and other relevant information on its website,
including how to access recommended immunizations.
(2) Any documents produced by the Department about the
recommended immunizations shall include a disclosure if the recommended
immunizations differ from the recommendations of the Vermont Immunization
Advisory Council.
(f) As used in this section, “health care professional” and “recommended
immunization” have the same meanings as in section 1130 of this title.
Sec. 3. 18 V.S.A. § 1131 is amended to read:
§ 1131. VERMONT IMMUNIZATION ADVISORY COUNCIL
(a) Creation. There is created the Vermont Immunization Advisory
Council for the purpose of providing education policy, medical, and
epidemiological expertise and advice to the Department with regard to the
safety of immunizations and immunization schedules.
(b) Membership. The Council shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) a representative the executive officer of the Vermont Board of
Medical Practice, appointed by the Governor or designee;
(2) the Secretaries Secretary of Human Services and of or designee;
(3) the Secretary of Education or their designees designee;
(3)(4) a representative of public schools, appointed by the Governor;
VT LEG #388353 v.1

No. 76 Page 8 of 22
2026
(4)(5) the State epidemiologist Epidemiologist or designee;
(6) the Department of Health’s Immunization Program Manager or
designee;
(7) a practicing pediatrician, appointed by the Governor;
(8) two individuals who are professors, researchers, or physicians, or
any combination of these individuals, with expertise in infectious disease and
human immunizations, appointed by the Governor;
(9) a family or internal medicine physician, appointed by the Governor;
(5)(10) a representative of both public and independent schools,
appointed by the Governor; and practicing advanced practice registered nurse
licensed pursuant to 26 V.S.A. chapter 28, appointed by the Governor;
(11) a practicing pharmacist licensed pursuant 26 V.S.A. chapter 36,
appointed by the Governor; and
(6)(12) any other persons deemed necessary by the Commissioner.
(c) Powers and duties Duties.
(1) The Council shall:
(1)(A) review and make recommendations regarding the State’s
immunization schedule for attendance in schools and child care facilities; and
(2)(B) provide any other advice and expertise requested by the
Commissioner, including advice regarding recommended immunizations as
defined in section 1130 of this title.
VT LEG #388353 v.1

No. 76 Page 9 of 22
2026
(2) The Secretary of Education or designee and representative of public
schools shall not vote on advice regarding recommended immunizations as
defined in section 1130 of this title.
(d) Assistance. The Council shall have the administrative, and technical,
and legal assistance of the Department.
(e) Meetings.
(1) The Council shall convene at the call of the Commissioner, but no
not less than once each year.
(2) The Council shall select a chair from among its members at the first
meeting who shall not be the Commissioner.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
* * * Effective on Passage until July 1, 2031: Insurance Coverage for
Commissioner of Health’s Recommended Immunizations * * *
Sec. 4. 8 V.S.A. § 4042 is amended to read:
§ 4042. GROUP INSURANCE POLICIES; REQUIRED POLICY
PROVISIONS
* * *
(b) Protections for covered individuals.
* * *
(4) No cost sharing for preventive services.
(A) A group insurance policy shall not impose any co-payment,
coinsurance, or deductible requirements for:
VT LEG #388353 v.1

No. 76 Page 10 of 22
2026
* * *
(ii) recommended immunizations for routine use in children,
adolescents, and adults that have in effect a recommendation from the
Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease
Control and Prevention with respect to the individual involved as defined in
18 V.S.A. § 1130;
* * *
Sec. 5. 33 V.S.A. § 1811 is amended to read:
§ 1811. HEALTH BENEFIT PLANS FOR INDIVIDUALS AND SMALL
EMPLOYERS
* * *
(d)(1) Guaranteed issue.
* * *
(5)(A) No cost sharing for preventive services. A health benefit plan
shall not impose any co-payment, coinsurance, or deductible requirements for:
* * *
(ii) recommended immunizations for routine use in children,
adolescents, and adults that have in effect a recommendation from the
Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease
Control and Prevention with respect to the individual involved as defined in 18
V.S.A. § 1130;
* * *
VT LEG #388353 v.1

No. 76 Page 11 of 22
2026
* * * Effective on Passage until July 1, 2031: Pharmacist and Pharmacy
Technician Authority under the Commissioner of Health’s Immunization
Recommendations * * *
Sec. 6. 26 V.S.A. § 2023 is amended to read:
§ 2023. CLINICAL PHARMACY; PRESCRIBING
* * *
(b) A pharmacist may prescribe in the following contexts:
* * *
(2) State protocol.
(A) A pharmacist may prescribe, order, or administer in a manner
consistent with valid State protocols that are approved by the Commissioner of
Health after consultation with the Director of Professional Regulation and the
Board and the ability for public comment:
(i) opioid antagonists;
(ii) epinephrine auto-injectors;
(iii) tobacco cessation products;
(iv) tuberculin purified protein derivative products;
(v) self-administered hormonal contraceptives, including
subcutaneous depot medroxyprogesterone acetate;
(vi) dietary fluoride supplements;
(vii) recommended immunizations as defined in 18 V.S.A. § 1130
for patients 18 years of age or older, vaccinations recommended by the Centers
VT LEG #388353 v.1

No. 76 Page 12 of 22
2026
for Disease Control and Prevention’s Advisory Committee on Immunization
Practices (ACIP) and administered consistently with the ACIP-approved
immunization schedules, as may be amended from time to time;
(viii) for patients five years of age or older, influenza vaccine
immunization, COVID-19 vaccine immunization, and subsequent formulations
or combination products thereof consistent with the recommendations
established in accordance with 18 V.S.A. § 1130a;
* * *
Sec. 7. 26 V.S.A. § 2042a is amended to read:
§ 2042a. PHARMACY TECHNICIANS; QUALIFICATIONS FOR
REGISTRATION
* * *
(c) Pharmacy technicians shall only administer immunizations:
(1) when a licensed pharmacist who is trained to immunize is present
and able to assist with the immunization, as needed;
(2) pursuant to:
(A) a valid prescription by a practitioner;
(B) a standing order made by the Commissioner of Health; or
(C) a protocol approved by the Commissioner of Health under
subdivision 2023(b)(2)(A) of this title; and
VT LEG #388353 v.1

No. 76 Page 13 of 22
2026
(3) to patients:
(A) 18 years of age or older, as established in subdivision
2023(b)(2)(A)(vii) and the resulting State protocol; and
(2)(B) to patients five years of age or older, seeking an influenza
vaccine immunization, COVID-19 vaccine immunization, and subsequent
formulations or combination products thereof, in accordance with subdivision
2023(b)(2)(A)(viii) and the resulting State protocol;
(3) pursuant to the schedules and recommendations of the Advisory
Committee on Immunization Practices’ recommendations for the
administration of immunizations, as those recommendations may be updated
from time to time; and
(4) when a licensed pharmacist who is trained to immunize is present
and able to assist with the immunization, as needed.
(d) Pharmacy technicians shall administer only those immunizations that:
(1) are recommended by the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention’s Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices (ACIP); and
(2) licensed pharmacists are permitted to administer under the State
clinical pharmacy protocol, as established in subdivision 2023(b)(2) of this
title.
(e) Pharmacy technicians performing COVID-19 tests shall do so only:
(1) when a licensed pharmacist who is trained to perform COVID-19
tests is present and able to assist with the test, as needed;
VT LEG #388353 v.1

No. 76 Page 14 of 22
2026
(2) in accordance with a State protocol adopted under subdivision
2023(b)(2)(A)(x) of this title; and
(3) in accordance with rules adopted by the Board.
(f)(e) The Board may adopt rules regarding the administration of
immunizations and the performance of COVID-19 tests by pharmacy
technicians.
* * * Effective on July 1, 2031: Restoring Certain Immunization
Recommendation Processes * * *
Sec. 8. 18 V.S.A. § 1130 is amended to read:
§ 1130. IMMUNIZATION FUNDING
(a) As used in this section:
* * *
(4) “Recommended immunization Immunization” means a vaccine or
other immunizing agent that provides protection against a particular disease or
pathogen and the application of the immunizations as recommended by the
practice guidelines for children and adults established by the Commissioner
pursuant to section 1130a of this title Advisory Committee on Immunization
Practices (ACIP) to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC).
* * *
(b)(1) The Department of Health shall administer an immunization
program with the goals of ensuring universal access to recommended
immunizations at no charge to the individual and reducing the cost at which the
VT LEG #388353 v.1

No. 76 Page 15 of 22
2026
State may purchase recommended immunizations. The Department shall
purchase, provide for the distribution of, and monitor the use of recommended
immunizations as provided for in this subsection and subsection (c) of this
section. The cost of the recommended immunizations and an administrative
surcharge shall be reimbursed by health insurers as provided for in subsections
(e) and (f) of this section.
(2) The Department shall solicit, facilitate, and supervise the
participation of health care professionals, health care facilities, and health
insurers in the immunization program in order to accomplish the State’s goal
of universal access to recommended immunizations at the lowest practicable
cost to individuals, insurers, and State health care programs.
(3) The Department shall gather and analyze data regarding the
immunization program for the purpose of ensuring its quality and maximizing
protection of Vermonters against diseases preventable by immunization.
(c) The Department shall determine which recommended immunizations
shall be purchased under the program. The immunization program shall
purchase recommended immunizations consistent with the goals of the
program from the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention or
another vendor at the lowest available cost. The Department shall determine
annually which immunizations for adults shall be purchased under the
program.
VT LEG #388353 v.1

No. 76 Page 16 of 22
2026
(d) The immunization program shall provide for distribution of the
recommended immunizations to health care professionals and health care
facilities for administration to patients.
(e) Health insurers shall remit to the Department the cost of recommended
immunizations, as established by the Commissioner based on the
recommendation of the Immunization Funding Advisory Committee
established in subsection (g) of this section.
(f) The Department shall charge each health insurer a surcharge for the
costs and administration of the immunization program. The surcharge shall be
deposited into an existing special fund and used solely for the purpose of
administering the program.
(g)(1) The Immunization Funding Advisory Committee is established to
provide the Commissioner with an annual per-member per-month cost for
recommended immunizations for the pediatric population, an annual per-
member per-month cost for recommended immunizations for the adult
population, and a recommendation for the amount of the yearly immunization
assessment. The Committee shall comprise the following nine members:
* * *
(2) The Committee shall select a chair from among its members at the
first meeting of each calendar year. The Committee shall receive
administrative and technical support from the Department.
VT LEG #388353 v.1

No. 76 Page 17 of 22
2026
(3) On or before January 1 of each year, the Committee shall provide to
the Commissioner the annual fiscal assessment and the per-member per-month
cost for pediatric recommended immunizations based on the total number of
pediatric covered lives reported by health insurers and the per-member per-
month cost for adult recommended immunizations based on the total number
of adult covered lives reported by health insurers.
(h) If federal purchase requirements do not further the goal of ensuring
universal access to recommended immunizations for all, the Commissioner
may, following consultation with the Immunization Funding Advisory
Committee, discontinue the program with six months’ advance notice to all
health care professionals and to all health insurers with Vermont covered lives.
(i) The Department may adopt rules under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to
implement this section.
Sec. 9. 18 V.S.A. § 1131 is amended to read:
§ 1131. VERMONT IMMUNIZATION ADVISORY COUNCIL
(a) Creation. There is created the Vermont Immunization Advisory
Council for the purpose of providing education policy, medical, and
epidemiological expertise and advice to the Department with regard to the
safety of immunizations and immunization schedules.
* * *
(c) Duties.
(1) The Council shall:
VT LEG #388353 v.1

No. 76 Page 18 of 22
2026
(A)(1) review and make recommendations regarding the State’s
immunization schedule for attendance in schools and child care facilities; and
(B)(2) provide any other advice and expertise requested by the
Commissioner, including advice regarding recommended immunizations as
defined in section 1130 of this title.
(2) The Secretary of Education or designee and representative of public
schools shall not vote on advice regarding recommended immunizations as
defined in section 1130 of this title.
* * *
(e) Meetings.
(1) The Council shall convene at the call of the Commissioner, but not
less than once each year.
(2) The Council shall select a chair from among its members at the first
meeting who shall not be the Commissioner.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
* * * Effective on July 1, 2031: Restoring the Current Insurance Coverage for
Immunizations in Effect Prior to Passage * * *
Sec. 10. 8 V.S.A. § 4042 is amended to read:
§ 4042. GROUP INSURANCE POLICIES; REQUIRED POLICY
PROVISIONS
* * *
(b) Protections for covered individuals.
VT LEG #388353 v.1

No. 76 Page 19 of 22
2026
* * *
(4) No cost sharing for preventive services.
(A) A group insurance policy shall not impose any co-payment,
coinsurance, or deductible requirements for:
* * *
(ii) recommended immunizations as defined in 18 V.S.A. § 1130
for routine use in children, adolescents, and adults that have in effect a
recommendation from the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of
the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention with respect to the individual
involved;
* * *
Sec. 11. 33 V.S.A. § 1811 is amended to read:
§ 1811. HEALTH BENEFIT PLANS FOR INDIVIDUALS AND SMALL
EMPLOYERS
* * *
(d)(1) Guaranteed issue.
(A) A registered carrier shall guarantee acceptance of all individuals
and their dependents for any health benefit plan offered by the carrier in the
individual market, regardless of any outstanding premium amount a subscriber
may owe to the carrier for coverage provided during the previous plan year.
* * *
VT LEG #388353 v.1

No. 76 Page 20 of 22
2026
(5)(A) No cost sharing for preventive services. A health benefit plan
shall not impose any co-payment, coinsurance, or deductible requirements for:
* * *
(ii) recommended immunizations as defined in 18 V.S.A. § 1130
for routine use in children, adolescents, and adults that have in effect a
recommendation from the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of
the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention with respect to the individual
involved;
* * *
* * * Effective on July 1, 2031: Restoring Current Pharmacist and Pharmacy
Technician Authority in Effect Prior to Passage * * *
Sec. 12. 26 V.S.A. § 2023 is amended to read:
§ 2023. CLINICAL PHARMACY; PRESCRIBING
* * *
(b) A pharmacist may prescribe in the following contexts:
* * *
(2) State protocol.
(A) A pharmacist may prescribe, order, or administer in a manner
consistent with valid State protocols that are approved by the Commissioner of
Health after consultation with the Director of Professional Regulation and the
Board and the ability for public comment:
VT LEG #388353 v.1

No. 76 Page 21 of 22
2026
(i) opioid antagonists;
(ii) epinephrine auto-injectors;
(iii) tobacco cessation products;
(iv) tuberculin purified protein derivative products;
(v) self-administered hormonal contraceptives, including
subcutaneous depot medroxyprogesterone acetate;
(vi) dietary fluoride supplements;
(vii) recommended immunizations as defined in 18 V.S.A. § 1130
for patients 18 years of age or older, vaccinations recommended by the Centers
for Disease Control and Prevention’s Advisory Committee on Immunization
Practices (ACIP) and administered consistently with the ACIP-approved
immunization schedules, as may be amended from time to time;
(viii) for patients five years of age or older, influenza
immunization vaccine, COVID-19 immunization vaccine, and subsequent
formulations or combination products thereof consistent with the
recommendations established in accordance with 18 V.S.A. § 1130a;
* * *
Sec. 13. [Deleted.]
* * * Effective on July 1, 2031: Repeal of Immunization
Recommendations * * *
Sec. 14. REPEAL; IMMUNIZATION RECOMMENDATIONS
VT LEG #388353 v.1

No. 76 Page 22 of 22
2026
18 V.S.A. § 1130a (recommended immunizations) is repealed on July 1,
2031.
* * * Effective Dates * * *
Sec. 15. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section, Secs. 1–7, and Sec. 14 shall take effect on passage.
(b) Secs. 8–13 shall take effect on July 1, 2031.
Date Governor signed bill: March 24, 2026
VT LEG #388353 v.1